Maryland, session 2026, HB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
21–123.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ACTIVELY MANAGED SEPARATE ACCOUNTS” MEANS THE
ACCOUNTS OF THE SEVERAL SYSTEMS THAT ARE ACTIVELY MANAGED AT THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1455*

HOUSE BILL 1455
DIRECTION OF THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES AND HELD IN SEPARATE ACCOUNTS.
(II) “ACTIVELY MANAGED SEPARATE ACCOUNTS” DOES NOT
MEAN INDEXED FUNDS, PRIVATE EQUITY FUNDS, REAL ESTATE FUNDS, OR OTHER
COMMINGLED OR PASSIVELY MANAGED FUNDS.
(3) “COMPANY” MEANS ANY CORPORATION, UTILITY, PARTNERSHIP,
JOINT VENTURE, FRANCHISOR, FRANCHISEE, TRUST, ENTITY INVESTMENT
VEHICLE, FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, OR A WHOLLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY OF ANY OF
THESE ENTITIES.
(4) “DIVESTMENT ACTION” MEANS SELLING, REDEEMING,
TRANSFERRING, EXCHANGING, OTHERWISE DISPOSING OF, AND REFRAINING FROM
FURTHER INVESTMENT IN CERTAIN INVESTMENTS.
(5) “ELIGIBLE ACCOUNTS” MEANS ACTIVELY MANAGED SEPARATE
ACCOUNTS CONTAINING FUNDS OF THE SEVERAL SYSTEMS.
(6) “INVESTMENT” MEANS THE COMMITMENT OF FUNDS OR OTHER
ASSETS TO A COMPANY, INCLUDING:
(I) THE OWNERSHIP OR CONTROL OF A SHARE OR INTEREST IN
THE COMPANY; OR
(II) THE OWNERSHIP OR CONTROL OF A BOND OR OTHER DEBT
INSTRUMENT OF A COMPANY.
(7) (I) “ISRAEL” MEANS THE GOVERNMENT OF ISRAEL.
(II) “ISRAEL” INCLUDES ALL AGENCIES, INSTITUTIONS,
INSTRUMENTALITIES, AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS OF ISRAEL.
(8) “ISRAEL–RESTRICTED INVESTMENT” MEANS AN INVESTMENT IN:
(I) THE DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION FOR ISRAEL;
(II) ANY SECURITY OR ASSET HELD IN OR ASSOCIATED WITH THE
GOVERNMENT OF ISRAEL; OR
(III) ANY BOND OR SOVEREIGN DEBT ISSUED BY THE
GOVERNMENT OF ISRAEL.
(B) THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL REVIEW THE INVESTMENT HOLDINGS
IN ELIGIBLE ACCOUNTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE EXTENT TO WHICH

HOUSE BILL 1455 3
FUNDS IN ELIGIBLE ACCOUNTS ARE INVESTED IN ISRAEL–RESTRICTED
INVESTMENTS.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
BOARD OF TRUSTEES:
(1) SHALL TAKE DIVESTMENT ACTION IN ELIGIBLE ACCOUNTS WITH
REGARD TO CURRENT ISRAEL–RESTRICTED INVESTMENTS; AND
(2) MAY NOT MAKE ANY NEW INVESTMENTS FROM NET NEW FUNDS IN
AN ELIGIBLE ACCOUNT IN ANY ISRAEL–RESTRICTED INVESTMENT.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD OF
TRUSTEES MAY EXCLUDE FROM THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION A DIVESTMENT ACTION THAT CANNOT BE EXECUTED FOR FAIR MARKET
VALUE OR GREATER.
(E) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1 AND OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD OF
TRUSTEES SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE
HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON PENSIONS
THAT PROVIDES:
(1) ALL DIVESTMENT ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION;
(2) A LIST OF INVESTMENTS THAT THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES HAS
DETERMINED TO BE INELIGIBLE FOR INVESTMENTS OF NET NEW FUNDS UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(3) OTHER DEVELOPMENTS RELEVANT TO ISRAEL–RESTRICTED
INVESTMENTS.
(F) THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OR ANY OTHER FIDUCIARY OF THE SEVERAL
SYSTEMS MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR ANY ACTIONS TAKEN OR DECISIONS MADE
IN GOOD FAITH FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPLYING WITH OR EXECUTING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF ANY DIVESTMENT PROVISIONS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(G) THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL ACT IN GOOD FAITH TO CARRY OUT
DIVESTMENT ACTION AS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL
APPLICABLE STATE, FEDERAL, AND INTERNATIONAL HUMAN RIGHTS LAW.
(H) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL REQUIRE THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES
TO TAKE ACTION AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES

HOUSE BILL 1455
DETERMINES IN GOOD FAITH THAT THE ACTION IS CONSISTENT WITH THE
FIDUCIARY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.